Louisiana, session 2026, SB369.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1867.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1867.1. Drug pricing
A. A pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not offer for the use of an Office
of Group Benefits insurance plan or any other state sponsored insurance plan
any drug at a price greater than the price Medicare pays for the same drug.
B. An insurer, pharmacy benefit manager, or person acting on behalf of
a pharmacy benefit manager shall not provide reimbursement on behalf of an
Office of Group Benefits insurance plan or any other state sponsored insurance
plan for any name brand drug, biosimilar, or generic drug that is less than the
price Medicare pays for the same drug.
C. The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this Section and
promulgate any rules and regulations that are necessary to carry out the
provisions.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-248 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 369
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.